Louisiana, session 2026, HB75.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 27:393(D) and 393.2 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§392. Collection and disposition of fees and taxes
* * *
D. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, absent a force majeure
event, the local governing authorities in the parish in which the licensed eligible
facility is located, and any other entities described in Subsections B and C of this
Section, shall not receive an amount less than the amount received during the 2025-
2026 fiscal year.
* * *
§393.2. Enhanced promotional play pilot program
A. Notwithstanding R.S. 27:353(9) or any other law to the contrary,
beginning on July 1, 2026 and terminating on June 30, 2027, for the purposes of this
Chapter, "net slot machine proceeds shall mean the total of all cash and property
received by a licensee from slot machine gaming operations minus the amount of
cash or prizes paid to winners and seven million dollars directly attributable to
promotional play wagers.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 75 ENROLLED
B. The additional two million dollars directly attributable to promotional
play wagers provided by this Section shall not be assigned to another licensee or
casino gaming operator as provided by Act No. 258 of the 2026 Regular Session.
C. No later than March 1, 2027, the licensees shall provide a comprehensive
report to the Gaming Control Board, the Senate Committee on Judiciary B, and the
House Committee on Administration of Criminal Justice demonstrating any
additional net slot machine proceeds directly attributable to the enhanced
promotional play for the period of July 1 through December 31, 2026, and the effect
on the collection and disposition of fees and taxes on credits deposited into local
governing authority funds described in R.S. 27:392.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall cease to be effective as of June 30, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.